apertium-rus.rus.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?> 
<dictionary>   
  <alphabet>АБВГДЕЁЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭЮЯабвгдеёжзийклмнопрстуфхцчшщъыьэюя</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="Verb 'to have'"/>
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="pred" 	c="Predicative"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Pre-adverb"/>
    <sdef n="part" 	c="Particle"/>
    <sdef n="abbr" 	c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="dat" 	c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="ins" 	c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="prp" 	c="Prepositional"/>
    <sdef n="loc" 	c="Locative"/>
    <sdef n="par" 	c="Partitive"/>
    <sdef n="short" 	c="Short form adjective"/>
    <sdef n="sint" 	c="Adjective with comparative"/>
    <sdef n="cmp" 	c="Compound form adjective"/>
    <sdef n="aa" 	c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="an" 	c="Animate / inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="nn" 	c="Inanimate"/>
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sint1" 	c="Synthetic #1"/>
    <sdef n="sint2" 	c="Synthetic #2"/>
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c="Masculine / feminine / neuter"/>
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mn" 	c="Masculine / neuter"/>
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/>
    <sdef n="pers" 	c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="coll" 	c="Collective"/>
    <sdef n="neg" 	c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="pprep" 	c="Pre-prepositional"/>
    <sdef n="perf" 	c="Perfective"/>
    <sdef n="impf" 	c="Imperfective"/>
    <sdef n="dual" 	c="Dual aspect"/>
    <sdef n="tv" 	c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv" 	c="Intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="actv" 	c="Active"/>
    <sdef n="pasv" 	c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="Present tense"/>
    <sdef n="fut" 	c="Future tense"/>
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="past" 	c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="nonpast" 	c="Present/future form for dual aspect verbs"/>
    <sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="org" 	c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="hyd" 	c="Hydronym"/>
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="al" 	c="Altres"/>
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="percent" 	c="Percent"/>
    <sdef n="roman" 	c="Roman numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="quot"      c="Quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio" 	c="Hyphen"/>    
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>     
 
<!-- PARDEFS SECTION BEGINS HERE -->

    <!-- PARDEFS: Punctuation -->  

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><p><l>№</l><r>№</r></p><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([ ][0-9]+)+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[IXV]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="roman"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="quantitats">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>км</l><r><b/>км<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>мм</l><r><b/>мм<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>см</l><r><b/>см<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>кг</l><r><b/>kг<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>–</l><r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!…"]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«“]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»”]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
       
    <!-- PARDEFS: Base paradigms -->   

    <pardef n="BASE__Саш/а">
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ей</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ею</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="BASE__Ван/я">
      <e><p><l>я</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ей</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ею</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="BASE__Украин/а">
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ой</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ою</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="BASE__Чернобыл/ь">
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ем</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e><par n="coma"/></e>
      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="guio"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
      <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
      <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
